Alabama, session 2026rs, SB106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 12-16-62, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§12-16-62
No qualified prospective juror is exempt from jury
service, except as provided in subsection (b).
(b) An individual who is 80 years of age or older may
submit a written statement to the court requesting that he or
she be permanently exempt from jury service. On receipt of the
request, the court shall remove the prospective juror from the
master jury list."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
SB106 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB106
Senate 24-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 07-Apr-26




By: Senator Butler
Page 2